Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-363
Existing mutual association, defined.

Existing mutual association shall mean a mutual association which was authorized to do business in Nebraska on August 30, 1981.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 8.